California, session 20252026, AB1295.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 739.17 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:739.17. (a) On or before June 1, 2026, the commission shall do both of the following:(1) Evaluate all customer billing and noticing requirements existing on January 1, 2026, that apply to gas or electric utilities.(2) Identify and consider potential avenues to consolidate notices and enhance billing transparency, including, but not limited to, avenues that would do both of the following:(A) Clearly show the source and value of each charge within each customer’s bill, including, but not limited to, commodities, taxes, public purpose programs, and community choice aggregator charges.(B) Use the most cost-effective communications channels, which may include, but are not limited to, email, an online portal, or a mobile application.(b) The commission may seek and consider input from utilities and other relevant stakeholders to inform its evaluation and identification and consideration of potential avenues to consolidate notices and enhance billing transparency.SECTION 1.Section 739.14 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:739.14.(a)Each public utility shall provide to its customers information on the additional costs that are attributable to state requirements or programs, including those imposed by statute, regulation, the commission, or the Energy Commission.(b)The information provided pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be provided quarterly on the customer billing statement in a visible area and in a similar size and font as the billing information.SEC. 2.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.